Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a city is prohibited from requiring or excluding exterior cladding materials that are in compliance with the state building code.(2) "Exterior cladding" means a nonload-bearing material attached to the exterior of a building.(3) The limitation in this section does not apply to homeowners' associations governed by chapter 64.38 RCW, plat communities governed by chapter 64.90 RCW, structures in an area designated as a local historic district, structures located in an area designated as a historic district on the national register of historic places, structures designated as a local, state, or national historic landmark, areas subject to provisions of the international wildland urban interface code adopted by a city or town, and any city or town with old world Bavarian architectural themed building requirements in law. Furthermore, a city or town that adopts building codes requiring fire-resistant siding materials as protection from wildfire is not in violation of the provisions of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a code city is prohibited from requiring or excluding exterior cladding materials that are in compliance with the state building code.(2) "Exterior cladding" means a nonload-bearing material attached to the exterior of a building.(3) The limitation in this section does not apply to homeowners' associations governed by chapter 64.38 RCW, plat communities governed by chapter 64.90 RCW, structures in an area designated as a local historic district, structures located in an area designated as a historic district on the national register of historic places, structures designated as a local, state, or national historic landmark, areas subject to provisions of the international wildland urban interface code adopted by a code city, and any code city with old world Bavarian architectural themed building requirements in law. Furthermore, a code city that adopts building codes requiring fire-resistant siding materials as protection from wildfire is not in violation of the provisions of this section.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a county is prohibited from requiring or excluding exterior cladding materials that are in compliance with the state building code.(2) "Exterior cladding" means a nonload-bearing material attached to the exterior of a building.(3) The limitation in this section does not apply to homeowners' associations governed by chapter 64.38 RCW, plat communities governed by chapter 64.90 RCW, structures in an area designated as a local historic district, structures located in an area designated as a historic district on the national register of historic places, structures designated as a local, state, or national historic landmark, areas subject to provisions of the international wildland urban interface code adopted by a county, and any structures in a county that are adjacent to a city or code city with old world Bavarian architectural themed building requirements in law. Furthermore, a county that adopts building codes requiring fire-resistant siding materials as protection from wildfire is not in violation of the provisions of this section.--- END ---